en: Rose syrups
de: Rosensirups
es: Jarabes de rosa
fr: Sirops de rose
hr: Sirupi od ruže
hu: Rózsaszirup
it: Sciroppi di rosa
nl: Rozensiropen, Rozensiroop, Rozesiropen, Rozen siroop
pt: Xaropes de rosa

en: Chestnut syrups
de: Kastaniensirups
es: Jarabes de castaña
fr: Sirops de châtaignes
hr: Sirupi od kestena
hu: Gesztenyeszirup
it: Sciroppi di castagne
nl: Kastanje siropen, Kastanje siroop, Kastanjesiroop
pt: Xaropes de castanha

en: Cherry syrups
de: Kirschsirups
es: Jarabes de cereza
fr: Sirops de cerise
hr: Sirupi od višanja
hu: Cseresznyeszirup
it: Sciroppi di ciliegia
lt: Vyšnių sirupai
nl: Kersensiropen, Kersensiroop
pl: Syropy wiśniowe
pt: Xaropes de cereja

en: Lime syrups
de: Limonensirups
fr: Sirops de citron vert
hr: Sirupi od limete
hu: Limeszirup
lt: Žaliųjų citrinų sirupai
nl: limoensiropen, Limoensiroop

en: Lemon base for beverage without sugar to be diluted, Lime base for beverage without sugar to be diluted
fr: Citron à diluer pour boissons, Citron vert à diluer pour boissons

en: Anise syrups, aniseeds syrups, Syrups with anise
de: Anissirups
fi: Anissiirapit
fr: Sirops à l'anis, Sirops d'anis
hr: Sirupi od anisa
hu: Ánizsszirup, Ánizsos szirup
nl: Anijssiropen, Anijssiroop
zh: 茴香糖浆

en: Kiwifruit syrups, Kiwi syrups
de: Kiwisirups
es: Siropes de kiwi
fr: Sirops de kiwi
hr: Sirupi od kivija
hu: Kiviszirup
it: Sciroppi di kiwi
nk: Kiwi siropen, Kiwi siroop, Kiwisiroop
nl: Kiwi siroop
pt: Xaropes de kiwi

en: Mango syrups
de: Mangosirups
es: Siropes de mango
fr: Sirops de mangue
hr: Sirupi od manga
hu: Mangószirup
it: Sciroppi di mango
nl: Mango siropen, Mango siroop, Mangosiroop

en: Mojito syrups
de: Mojito-Sirups
es: Siropes de mojito
fr: Sirops mojito
hr: Mojito sirupi
hu: Mojito szirup
it: Sciroppi di mojito
nl: Mojito siropen, Mojito siroop, Mojitosiroop
pl: Syropy mojito
pt: Xaropes de mojito

en: Peach syrups
de: Pfirsichsirups
es: Siropes de melocotón
fi: persikkasiirapit
fr: Sirops de pêche, Sirops à la pêche
hr: Sirupi od breskve
hu: Őszibarackszirup
it: Sciroppi di pesca
lt: Persikų sirupai
nl: Perzikensiropen, Perzikensiroop, Perzikkensiroop
pl: Syropy brzoskwiniowe

en: Pineapple syrups
bg: Сироп от ананас
de: Annanassirups
fr: Sirops d'ananas
hr: Sirupi od ananasa
hu: Ananászszirup
lt: Ananasų sirupai
nl: Ananassiropen, Ananassiroop
pl: Syropy ananasowe

en: Cola syrups
de: Cola-Sirups
es: Jarabes de cola
fr: Sirops cola
hr: Cola sirupi
hu: Kólaszirup
it: Sciroppi di cola
lt: Kolos sirupai
nl: Cola-siropen, Cola-siroop, Cola siroop, Colasiropen, Colasiroop
pl: Syropy cola

en: Mirabelle syrups
de: Mirabellensirups
fr: Sirops à la mirabelle
hr: Mirabelle sirupi
nl: Mirabelle-siropen, Mirabelle-siroop

en: Blueberry syrups
de: Heidelbeersirups, Blaubeersirups
fr: Sirops de myrtille
hr: Sirupi od borovnice
hu: Áfonyaszirup
lt: Mėlynių sirupai
nl: Blauwe bessensiropen, Blauwe bessensiroop

en: Blackcurrant syrups
de: Schwarze Johannisbeersirups, Cassis-Sirups
fi: mustaherukkasiirapit
fr: Sirops de cassis, sirop de cassis
hr: Sirupi od crnog ribiza
lt: Juodųjų serbentų sirupai
nl: Cassissiropen, Casissiroop, Cassis-siroop, Cassis-siropen, Cassis siroop

en: Lemon syrups
de: Zitronensirups
es: Siropes de limón
fi: sitruunasiirapit
fr: Sirops de citron, sirop de citron
hr: Sirupi od limuna
hu: Citromszirup
it: Sciroppo di limone
lt: Citrinų sirupai
nl: Citroensiropen, Citroensiroop

en: Raspberry syrups
de: Himbeersirups
fi: vadelmasiirapit
fr: Sirops de framboise
hr: Sirupi od malina
hu: Málnaszirup
it: Sciroppo di lampone
lt: Aviečių sirupai
nl: Frambozensiropen, Frambozensiroop, Frambozesiroop

en: Strawberry syrups
de: Erdbeersirups
es: Siropes de fresa
fi: mansikkasiirapit
fr: Sirops de fraise, sirop de fraise
hr: Sirupi od jagoda
hu: Eperszirup
it: Sciroppo alla fragola
lt: Braškių sirupai
nl: Aardbeiensiropen, Aardbeiensiroop
pl: Syropy truskawkowe

en: Grenadine, Grenadine syrups, pomegranate syrup
de: Grenadinensirups
es: Granadina, jarabe de granadina, Sirope de granadina
fi: granaattiomenasiirappi
fr: Sirops de grenadine, sirop de grenadine
hr: Grenadin
it: Granatina, Sciroppo alla granatina
lt: Granatų sirupai
nl: Grenadinesiropen, Grenadinesiroop
pl: Syropy z granatu, Grenadyna

en: Mint syrups, Mint syrup
de: Minzsirups
es: Siropes de menta
fi: minttusiirapit
fr: Sirops de menthe, sirop de menthe
hr: Sirupi od mente
hu: Mentaszirupok, Mentaszirup
it: Sciroppo alla menta
lt: Mėtų sirupai
nl: Pepermuntsiropen, Pepermuntsiroop, Muntsiroop